California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
All evidence and exhibits and all facts and data which are used directly or indirectly by the director, or introduced at a hearing shall, within a reasonable time after being used or introduced, be available at the office of the director to all interested parties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59654.

The director may decline to hold a public hearing upon a proposed proration zone and a proposed marketing program if he determines and is satisfied that a public hearing cannot be held within a reasonable time in advance of the harvesting of, or the beginning of the marketing season for, the commodity, so as to permit the formulation and establishment of an equitable and effective marketing program for the marketing season.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59655.

Before issuing a marketing program for the written assent of producers, which contains provisions for correlating the supply of the commodity which is affected with market demands for it by means of restrictions upon the total quantity of the commodity, or restrictions upon the total quantity of any grade, size, quality, or condition of it, which restrictions have the effect of limiting the total quantity of the commodity which may be marketed during any marketing season and which restricted portion of the commodity might otherwise be marketed by producers in compliance with other laws of this state or of the United States, or in compliance with established commercial practice during the marketing season, the director shall make all of the following findings with respect to the marketing program:

(a) The marketing program will tend to reestablish or maintain such level of prices for the commodity as will provide a purchasing power for the commodity which is adequate to maintain in the business of producing the commodity such number of producers as is required to provide such supply of the quantities and qualities of the commodity as is necessary to fulfill the normal requirements of consumers.

(b) The marketing program will tend to approach such equality of purchasing power at as rapid a rate as is feasible in view of the market demand for the commodity.

(c) The marketing program conforms with the provisions of this chapter and will tend to effectuate the declared purposes and policies of this chapter.

(d) The marketing program will protect the interest of consumers of the commodity through the exercise of the powers of this chapter only to such an extent as is necessary to establish the level of purchasing power which is described in subdivision (a) of this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59656.

In making the findings which are required by Section 59655, the director shall take into consideration all facts which are available to him with respect to all of the following economic factors.

(a) The quantity of the commodity which is available for distribution.

(b) The quantity of the commodity which is normally entered into primary channels of trade.

(c) The necessary costs of producing the commodity as determined by available surveys or other facts.

(d) The purchasing power of consumers as indicated by available reports and indices.

(e) The level of prices of other commodities which compete with, or are utilized as substitutes for, the commodity.

(f) The level of prices of other commodities, services, and articles which producers commonly purchase.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59657.

Before issuing a marketing program for the written assent of producers, which contains provisions for the purpose of regulating the flow of the commodity, or any grade or size of it, to market without restricting the total quantity which may be marketed during the season, or which marketing program provides for the establishment of grade, size, quality, or condition specifications, for uniform grading and inspection, or for advertising and trade promotion, the director shall make all of the following findings with respect to the marketing program:

(a) The marketing program will tend to attain the objectives which are sought by the program.

(b) The marketing program conforms with the provisions of this chapter and will tend to effectuate the declared purposes and policies of this chapter.

(c) The marketing program will protect the interests of consumers in that the powers of this chapter are being exercised only to the extent which is necessary to attain the objectives of the program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59658.

In making any findings pursuant to Section 59657, the director shall base his findings upon the facts, testimony, and evidence which is received at the public hearing together with any other relevant facts which are available to him from official publications or institutions of recognized standing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59659.

In addition to either of the applicable findings prescribed by Section 59655 or 59657, the director shall find that the proposed proration zone includes all of the area within this state which is reasonably necessary to carry out and attain the objectives of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59660.

If, at a public hearing which includes a consideration of the establishment of the boundaries of a proration zone, it appears that the inclusion of territory additional to that which is described in the petition that is being heard is necessary to the proper administration or enforcement of the proposed marketing program, the director shall postpone further proceedings until notice has been given by the director to the producers within the additional territory in the manner which is provided for in Sections 59643, 59644, 59650, 59652, 59653, and 59654. Thereafter, the director may conclude the hearing, and prepare his findings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59662.

Each proration zone is a separate public corporate entity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Change of Proration Zone Boundaries [59691. - 59694.]

59691.

Any area within the state which is not already included in a proration zone that produces the same kind or variety of a commodity as is produced in a proration zone which is already established pursuant to this chapter, and regulated by a marketing program, may be added or annexed to the established proration zone pursuant to this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59692.

A petition to change the boundaries of any proration zone may be filed with the director by producers that produce not less than 10 percent of the production of the commodity which is affected that is produced within the boundaries of the proration zone which is established, or within the boundaries of the area which is proposed to be added. The petition may request that the existing marketing program or a proposed marketing program, as amended, be made applicable to the entire area which is included within the proposed changed boundaries of the proration zone. Upon the receipt of such a petition, the director shall hold a public hearing, as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 59641) of this chapter, and receive evidence as to whether or not the boundaries of the proration zone as established shall be changed as recommended.

The director shall also, at the hearing, receive evidence with respect to the marketing program which is to be applicable to all of the area within the proposed changed boundaries of the proration zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59693.

After the hearing, findings shall be made and procedures followed which are in accordance with the applicable provisions of Article 5 (commencing with Section 59641) of this chapter. If the findings are positive, a marketing program is issued, and a proration zone with new boundaries is established, the marketing program shall be submitted to producers within the zone for their written assent as prescribed by the applicable provisions and procedures of Article 9 (commencing with Section 59851) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59694.

If the marketing program which is submitted is not assented to by producers in sufficient number and by sufficient volume to meet the requirements of Article 9 (commencing with Section 59851) of this chapter, the director shall dismiss the proceedings which were instituted to change or annex the boundaries of the proration zone, and the marketing program in operation at the time the proceedings were instituted shall continue to be effective within the boundaries of the proration zone as constituted prior to the proceedings. The marketing program has the same force and effect as though no proceedings had been instituted pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Marketing Program and Grading Committees [59721. - 59738.]

59721.

The affairs of each proration zone shall be managed by a marketing program committee which is appointed in accordance with this chapter. The director shall appoint the initial marketing program committee from nominations which are received at the public hearing upon the proposed program. The term of office of the initial marketing program committee shall be for one marketing season. The term of office of subsequent marketing program committees for each marketing program shall be two years or until their successors have been appointed and have qualified. The beginning date of the term of office shall be set forth in the marketing program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59722.

For terms subsequent to the term of the initial committee, members and their respective alternates shall be selected and appointed in accordance with the following procedure: The director shall divide the proration zone into as many districts as may be necessary for the proper administration of the program, and allot to each district the proper number of producers to be appointed to serve as members and alternate members upon a marketing program committee so as to give as nearly as possible adequate representation to all producers in all such districts. Members and their respective alternate members shall be appointed by the director from lists of producers that are eligible to serve on the marketing program committee. In addition, the director may appoint one public member on each such marketing program committee.

Upon the director’s request, the committee shall submit to the director the names of three or more natural persons, each of whom shall be a citizen and resident of this state and not a producer, shipper, or processor nor financially interested in any producer, shipper, or processor, for appointment by the director as a public member of the committee. The director may appoint one of the nominees as the public member on the committee. If all nominees are unsatisfactory to the director, the committee shall continue to submit lists of nominees until the director has made a selection. Any vacancy in the office of the public member of the committee shall be filled by appointment by the director from the nominee or nominees similarly qualified submitted by the committee. The public member of the committee shall represent the interests of the general public in all matters coming before the committee and shall have the same voting and other rights and immunities as other members of the committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 188.)
-------------------------------------------

59723.

Eligible lists shall be established by the director either by means of a meeting of producers in each district, or by means of mail ballot, or by a combination of meetings and mail ballot. The method to be used shall be determined by the director, except that a mail ballot shall be granted upon a written request of 10 percent of the producers. Each producer is entitled to one vote and voting by proxy is not permitted. From nominations which are made, not less than three eligible persons shall be selected for each member of the committee. Any person that is nominated shall be a producer with producing property which is located within the district for which he is nominated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59724.

If a corporation or a partnership is a producer, it may designate a representative who may be a nominee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59725.

Each respective alternate shall be appointed from the same eligible list from which the member is appointed. Each district in the proration zone is entitled to at least one member and one alternate member of the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59726.

The marketing program committee may at any time invite any handler or other person to its meetings to serve in an advisory capacity and may authorize, subject to the approval of the director, the payment of compensation and necessary expenses to any person that is serving in such advisory capacity at rates not to exceed those which are granted to marketing program committee members.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59727.

The director may, if requested by the producer members of the marketing program committee, appoint on the committee, in addition to the producer members, not more than three handler members and their respective alternates who are handlers of the commodity which is affected by the marketing program of the proration zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59728.

If grade, quality, or size regulations are authorized under any marketing program for any commodity which is used for canning, freezing, fermenting, or distilling, and the regulations are not an integral part of a proration plan for the purpose of controlling a surplus condition in the commodity, such grade, quality, or size regulations or interpretations, or modifications of them, shall be approved by a grading committee which is appointed by the director. A grading committee shall consist of the marketing program committee, or a subcommittee, of at least seven members and an equal number of processor representatives that are nominated by the industry which is engaged in the processing of the commodity that is involved. Any action of the grading committee shall be concurred in by a majority of the processor members, a majority of the producer members, and by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59729.

The members and alternate members of any marketing program committee or grading committee which are duly appointed by the director, including employees of the marketing program committee, are not responsible individually in any way whatsoever to any person for liability on any contract or agreement of the committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59730.

Marketing program committee members are entitled to compensation at a rate not exceeding ten dollars ($10) each for each day while engaged on official business. Such compensation shall not, however, be paid for more than five days in any month unless approved by the director. The members shall be reimbursed for their necessary traveling expenses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59731.

An alternate member of a marketing program committee shall sit as a regular member of the committee if the member for whom he is an alternate fails for any reason to attend any meeting of the committee. He shall be compensated and reimbursed for his necessary traveling expenses in the same manner and to the same extent as a regular member while so serving.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59732.

Any vacancy on the marketing program committee which is occasioned by the expiration of term of office shall be filled from eligible lists of producers selected in each district obtained as provided in Sections 59721 to 59729, inclusive. Any vacancy which is occasioned by the death or resignation of any member, or by removal for incompetence, inattention, or neglect of duties as a member of the marketing program committee, by the director, or by a member who ceases to qualify as a producer or handler of the commodity which is concerned, shall be filled from persons who remain on the eligible lists of producers from which the appointments for the current term were made, or from new lists which are obtained as provided in Sections 59721 to 59729, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59733.

The marketing program committee shall appoint an agent, subject to the approval of the director, who shall administer the marketing program under the direction of the marketing program committee and who may be removed from office in the same manner as he was appointed. The salary or compensation of the agent shall be fixed by the marketing program committee, subject to the approval of the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59734.

The agent shall appoint such deputy agents and other assistants as may be necessary to direct the marketing program. Such appointments are subject to the approval of the program committee. The agents, deputy agents, and other assistants are employees of the proration zone and not of the state. An officer or employee shall not receive compensation which is based on a percentage of volume which is involved in a marketing program, or in any manner that would lend encouragement to the promotion of a marketing program for the purpose of increasing salaries and income.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59735.

The marketing program committee, with the approval of the director, may do all of the following:

(a) Appoint subcommittees in any producing areas within the proration zone to facilitate the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter.

(b) Collaborate and cooperate with any agency or organization with similar purposes, whether of this state, any other state, or of the United States, in the formulation and execution of any marketing program or marketing order which has common objectives. In any proper case, the director may require such collaboration and cooperation.

(c) Cooperate with any duly constituted authority in the enforcement of other laws of this state, or of the United States, which are enacted to protect producers or the consuming public from fraud or deception.

(d) Make contracts and agreements in the furtherance of any of the powers of the marketing program committee.

(e) Receive, invest, and disburse funds, pursuant to the provisions of Article 12 (commencing with Section 59941).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 641, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

59736.

The exercise of the powers which are granted to a marketing program committee in its administration of a marketing program which is made effective pursuant to this chapter is subject to the approval of the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59737.

Upon recommendation of the marketing program committee which is concerned, the director may, consistent with this chapter, establish such administrative regulations as may be necessary to facilitate the administration and enforcement of each marketing program which is promulgated pursuant to this chapter. Upon the issuance and making effective of such regulations, notice of the issuance of the regulations shall be made in the same manner as provided in Article 16 (commencing with Section 59111), Chapter 1, Part 2 of this division for marketing orders.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59738.

It is hereby declared, as a matter of legislative determination, that producers, or handlers, and processors appointed to any committees pursuant to this article are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular agricultural industry concerned, and that such representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are appointed to such committees, the particular agricultural industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1429.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Marketing Programs [59801. - 59824.]

59801.

The powers which are granted to a marketing program committee by a marketing program pursuant to this article may be exercised for the purpose of minimizing the effect of any surplus or other adverse market condition.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59802.

A marketing program may authorize the marketing program committee to establish and maintain stabilization and surplus pools. The marketing of green ripe olives is not, however, subject to the provisions of any marketing program which relates to the esablishment and operation of stabilization and surplus pools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59803.

The program committee may receive from each producer for delivery into a stabilization or surplus pool the uncertificated portions of the commodity which is regulated by the marketing program and market it by any variety, grade, or size for the account of the producers if the uncertificated portion can be disposed of advantageously either in its original or a converted state. The marketing program committee shall designate the quantity or the percentage of the marketable supply of the commodity that shall be placed in the stabilization pool and the quantity or the percentage of the marketable supply of the commodity that shall be placed in the surplus pool. Any quantity or percentage which is so established is applicable to each producer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59804.

In operating any stabilization or surplus pool, the marketing program committee may receive and account for the commodity on the basis of variety, grade, or size classifications, and may fix servicing charges to be assessed against the total quantity of any commodity which is received into the pools.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59805.

The marketing program committee has title to all of the commodity in each of the pools and shall handle all of the commodity received into each of the pools and account for it to each producer that is beneficially interested in such commodity upon a pooled basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59806.

The contents of a stabilization pool may be disposed of or may be marketed, from time to time, as the marketing program committee deems advisable, consistent with the maintenance of stabilized marketing conditions.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59807.

The contents of a surplus pool shall not be marketed in any form which would directly compete with that portion of the commodity which is regularly certificated or which is in a stabilization pool. Any part of any surplus pool may, however, be transferred by a marketing program committee on a gratuitous basis to any charitable organization, self-held cooperative, or similar agency under proper safeguards to prevent any part of the commodity so disposed of from directly competing with the part of the commodity which is marketed through the usual channels of trade.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59808.

A marketing program may authorize the marketing program committee to establish and maintain diversion or substandard pools. The program committee may receive from each producer for delivery into a diversion or a substandard pool such quantity of each producer’s production or deliveries as fails to qualify for marketing or sale in regular marketing channels, under grade, quality, or size regulations which are established in the marketing program or under standardization laws or other laws of this state or of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59809.

In operating any such diversion or substandard pool, the marketing program committee may fix servicing charges to be assessed against the commodity which is received into the pool and may receive and account for the commodity on a basis of variety, grade, and size classifications. The program committee has title to all of the commodity in either of the pools and shall handle all of the commodity which is received into either of the pools and account for it to each producer that is beneficially interested in such upon a pooled basis.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59810.

The contents of any diversion or substandard pool shall be disposed of for byproducts or for other purposes under proper safeguards to prevent that part of the commodity which is so disposed of from directly competing with the part of the commodity which is marketed in its usual form through the usual channels of trade.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59811.

A marketing program may authorize the marketing program committee to create, establish, or otherwise obtain and operate any facility for the storing, financing, grading, packing, servicing, processing, preparing for market, selling, or disposal of the contents of any pools which are provided for in this article. A marketing program committee shall not, however, engage in public warehousing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59812.

The marketing program committee may pledge all of the commodity that is in any pool which is established pursuant to any provision of this article with a bank or other lending agency for the purpose of obtaining loans upon such commodity. The marketing program committee has title to all of the commodity which is in any such pools for the purpose of financing and handling.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59813.

A marketing program may authorize the marketing program committee to create, by a uniform assessment upon producers based upon the volume of the commodity which is marketed by each, or upon some other uniform and equitable basis, maintain, and disburse an equalization fund to be used for the removal of any inequalities between producers as to the total volume which is marketed through prorated channels that result from errors in estimating production or surplus, or for indemnifying producers whose production, in whole or in part, is diverted in green form or otherwise from normal marketing outlets, or diverted to relief, byproducts, or other noncompetitive purposes pursuant to a marketing program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59814.

No part of any funds which are raised for equalization fund purposes, as specified in Section 59813, shall be applied to the cost of maintenance of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------

59815.

A marketing program may authorize the marketing program committee to establish, adopt, and apply methods for correlating the marketable supply of any commodity to the reasonable market demands by means of volume limitation, time limitation, diversion, or by grade, quality, or size regulations which are applicable to the total production of any commodity, or to that portion of any commodity which qualified for marketing pursuant to standards which are authorized in the marketing program, standardization laws, or other laws of this state, or of the United States.

The marketing of green ripe olives is not, however, subject to the provisions of any marketing program which limits the total quantity of such commodity which may be marketed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59816.

A marketing program may authorize the marketing program committee to broaden distribution and increase consuming outlets by appropriate educational and trade stimulation efforts of a general industry nature and not unfairly depreciative of the quality of any other food product.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59817.

Educational and trade stimulation efforts may include all of the following:

(a) Efforts to prevent, modify, or remove trade barriers which directly affect the commodity to which the marketing program applies.

(b) The presentation of facts to, and negotiations with, any state, federal, or foreign governmental agency on any matter which affects the marketing of the commodity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59818.

For the purpose of providing funds to defray the cost of formulating, administering, and enforcing educational and trade stimulation efforts, a fee or assessment shall be established and collected upon the volume of the commodity which is marketed or upon some other uniform and equitable basis.

The fee may be collected separately by the marketing program committee or may be combined with any fee which is collected for general administrative purposes, in which case the marketing program committee may recommend to the director, and the director may approve, the proportions of the combined fee which may be expended for each of such purposes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59819.

Any portion of the funds which are collected during any marketing season to accomplish the purposes of Sections 59816, 59817, and 59818 may, subject to the approval of the director, be carried forward for expenditure during any season subsequent to the season during which the funds are collected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59820.

Any educational and trade stimulation efforts which are authorized by any marketing program if approved by growers, either by written assent or by referendum ballots, for a specified period of time, but not exceeding four years, may be carried out for such period without the necessity of a biennial referendum as required in Section 59981.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59821.

A marketing program may authorize the marketing program committee to provide for the adjustment of production of any commodity by means of tree or vine pulling. The marketing program committee may receive applications from producers for acreage adjustment payments. The marketing program committee shall, upon proper review and certification, make such acreage adjustment payments on an equitable basis from funds which are collected for that purpose under the marketing program on a uniform basis from all commercial producers of the commodity within the proration zone, or from funds which are received from any federal, state, or other agency for that purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59822.

A marketing program of production adjustment adopted under Section 59821 shall not authorize any payment for the removal of acreages of trees or vines of any species or variety specified in the marketing program which have, during the three years immediately preceding the date of application, produced an annual yield per acre in excess of the comparably computed average yield from bearing trees or vines of the same species or variety for the state as a whole. Such yields and averages shall be determined by the director from statistical data which is compiled by any state or federal agency or such other data as the director deems to be representative and reliable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59823.

If the marketing program committee finds that the results of research would be advantageous in the administration of a marketing program, it may, subject to the approval of the director, authorize and arrange for research to be conducted. The cost of the research shall be considered a part of the cost of the administration of that portion of the marketing program for which the research is authorized.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59824.

In any such research, the Dean of the College of Agriculture of the University of California and the program committee shall cooperate in selecting the research projects to be carried on from time to time. Insofar as practicable, the projects shall be carried out by the College of Agriculture, but if the dean of the college and the marketing program committee determine that the college has no facilities for a particular project or that some other research agency has better facilities for it, the project may be carried out by any other research agency which is selected by the dean and the marketing program committee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Assents to Marketing Programs [59851. - 59857.]

59851.

Upon the issuance of a marketing program for the written assent of producers, the director shall submit a copy of the marketing program in full to each of the producers of the commodity which is to be affected, or their duly authorized agent, within the proposed proration zone as shown by the lists of producers which are compiled in accordance with this chapter, accompanied by a printed, typewritten, or mimeographed form upon which the producer can record his assent to the marketing program.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59852.

A nonprofit cooperative association may assent on behalf of any of its members only if it is authorized so to do by an instrument in writing which is signed by the member.

Such authority may be revoked as to him by any such member by an instrument in writing which is filed with the director and with such association. The revocation shall become effective three days after its receipt by the director. A copy of any written authorization, or any revocation of such authority, of a producer to the nonprofit cooperative association of which he is a member shall be forwarded to the director by the association.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59853.

The director may at the time of mailing to producers a marketing program or amendments to it for written assent, establish a closing date after which assents will not be counted. If he does so, the closing date upon which assents are required to be postmarked in order to be counted shall be shown on the assent form and be announced by a press release for general dissemination which is issued by the director.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59854.

If the closing date is not established at the time assent forms are mailed to producers, and the director subsequently finds that because of the oncoming harvesting season or because of any other relevant reason it is desirable to fix a closing date for filing assents, he may do so by publishing a notice pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the capital of the state and in such other localities as the director may prescribe not less than 10 days prior to the closing date. The closing date shall also be announced by a press release for general dissemination which is issued by the director at least 10 days prior to the closing date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59855.

If the director finds that the marketing program has been assented to in writing by one of the following, he shall make the marketing program effective:

(a) Not less than 65 percent of the producers in the proration zone that produced for market not less than 51 percent of the quantity of the commodity which was produced in the proration zone in the next preceding season.

(b) Not less than 51 percent of the producers that produced for market not less than 65 percent of the quantity of such commodity which was produced in the proration zone in the next preceding season.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59856.

If the director makes a marketing program effective, he shall publish a notice of the effective date pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in the capital of the state and in such other localities as the director may prescribe, not less than five days prior to the effective date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59857.

A member of the marketing program committee, or the proration zone agent, shall not unduly influence producers in their choice either for or against the institution of a marketing program, or for or against the termination of such a marketing program.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 59610 by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1186.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Proration Certificates [59881. - 59886.]

59881.

After any marketing program has been formulated and has been approved as provided in this chapter, the agent for the proration zone shall assume the administration of the marketing program and any subsequent modification of it and the issuance of proration certificates pursuant to it. Such certificates shall be divided into primary and secondary certificates.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59882.

Each producer is entitled to one primary certificate which may indicate the quantities of the commodity for which the marketing program has been instituted which the producer that is named in the certificate is entitled to harvest or otherwise prepare for market and delivery into the primary channels of trade. The primary certificate may also indicate from time to time the number of secondary certificates which are issued under it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

59883.
